Vermont statutes. Title 12 Court Procedure
Chapter 105. Writs of Error

§§ 2491-2496.
Repealed.
1971, No. 185 (Adj. Sess.), § 237, eff. March 29, 1972.

§ 2497.
Limitation of time for proceedings in certiorari.

Proceedings in certiorari shall be commenced within one year after the rendition of the judgment or order to review which proceedings are commenced. If a person entitled to bring proceedings is, at the time the judgment or order is rendered, a minor, or a person who lacks capacity to protect his or her interests due to a mental condition or psychiatric disability, or imprisoned, he or she may bring them within one year after the disability is removed.

HISTORY:

Amended

1971, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 59, eff. March 29, 1972;

2013, No. 96

(Adj. Sess.), § 47.